New York, session 2025-2026, A3429.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as "Raylee's law". 2 § 2. Section 3205 of the education law is amended by adding a new 3 subdivision 4 to read as follows: 4 4. A school district may not authorize a currently enrolled public 5 school student to be instructed in the home if there is a pending child 6 abuse or neglect investigation against either custodial parent or a 7 person instructing the child, or if either custodial parent or a person 8 instructing the child has ever been convicted of domestic violence or 9 child abuse or neglect. The board of education of every school district 10 within the state shall develop and institute a policy to ensure that the 11 school district superintendent is contacted when a report of suspected 12 child abuse or neglect is made by a school teacher or other school 13 personnel. Upon determination by the school district superintendent that 14 an investigation has been initiated, the superintendent shall request 15 confirmation of case status from the office of children and family 16 services, which shall provide confirmation within forty-eight hours of 17 receipt of such request. 18 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04232-01-5